Georgia statutes. 
(g) If confirmation of issuance is not filed with the department on or before the applicable expiration date, the notice of allocation shall cease to be effective and the amount covered by the notice of allocation shall automatically be added to the appropriate housing reservation, as applicable, if on or before September 30 of 1991 and September 30 each year thereafter or the flexible share if after June 30 of 1990 or September 30 of 1991 and September 30 each year thereafter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-193.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 165, § 8; Code 1981, § 36-82-192, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Former Code Section 36-82-192 was redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1 as present Code Section 36-82-191.

36-82-192.1. Application for single-family project; notice of allocation; waiver of provisions by commissioner.

Statute text

Repealed by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1989, p. 165, § 6.

36-82-193. Flexible share for 1990.

Statute text

Commencing on April 1, 1990, the flexible share for 1990 is established in an amount equal to 20 percent of the state ceiling. The 1990 percentage shall include any allocations made from the flexible pool prior to April 1, 1990. The flexible share for 1991 and years thereafter shall be in an amount equal to 15 percent of the state ceiling. The flexible share shall be available for notices of allocation given during period 2 through period 4 in 1990 and period 1 through period 4 in 1991 and each year thereafter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-193, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990 repealed former Code Section 36-82-193, as enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1 and amended by Ga. L. 1989, p. 165, § 7, relating to applications for notices of allocation from the multifamily pool, and enacted the current Code section.

36-82-194. Application for flexible pool allocation; issue of notice; confirmation; expiration.

Statute text

(a) Applications for notices of allocation from the flexible share shall be received and acted on by the department as set forth in this Code section.

(b) Applications for housing bonds shall be filed on the same forms and accompanied by the same items as applications for notices of allocation with respect to such bonds from the housing share. Applications for student loan bonds shall be filed on the same forms and accompanied by the same items as required by Code Section 36-82-185 and a written opinion of legal counsel, addressed to the department, to the effect that the bonds which are covered by the application will, based upon information available at that time to such legal counsel, qualify as student loan bonds under Section 144(b) of the Federal Code when issued. Applications for all other bonds shall be filed on the same forms and accompanied by the same items as applications for notices of allocation from the economic development share. Such applications need not designate that they are filed for a notice of allocation from the flexible share but may be treated as such by the department in its discretion.

(c) The department shall, in its discretion, decide which application or applications shall receive a notice of allocation. The decision of the department shall be final and conclusive.

(d) The provisions of subsection (i) of Code Section 36-82-187 with respect to notices of allocation from the economic development share shall also apply to notices of allocation from the flexible share. Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (i) of Code Section 36-82-187, however, the expiration date for a notice of allocation for the private activity portion of governmental use bonds shall be such date as the commissioner may determine, separately in the case of each notice of allocation, and may be extended for any period of time at the department's discretion.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-199, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-82-194, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990, repealed the former Code Section 36-82-194, which was based on Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1, and which related to applications for notices of allocation from the general pool.

36-82-195. Policy guidelines for making allocations.

Statute text

(a) When the department is required to decide which applications should receive a notice of allocation, it shall compare the applications from which the selection is to be made, applying the policy guidelines set forth in this Code section. These policy guidelines are designed to assist the department in making its decisions and are not intended to establish definitive tests or standards. The decision which the department makes shall be final and conclusive. Each of the policy guidelines will be applied following the principle that, if all other things were equal among applications which are being compared, the application which most satisfied the intention of the particular policy guideline would be given a notice of allocation. The policy guidelines are stated in subsection (b) of this Code section, and the order in which they are stated does not indicate any priority of one over another.

(b) (1) Special consideration shall be given to projects with a view toward an even and more broadly based geographical distribution of bond issues or bond proceeds, as the case may be, over the state. Applications should be compared based upon the geographic distribution of notices of allocation given during the same calendar year. The department may compare geographic distribution among counties, municipalities, United States congressional districts, or any other geographical areas the department may select. In comparing geographic distribution, the department may consider the amount of bonds covered by notices of allocation and the location of the projects covered by such notices of allocation. For purposes of this policy guideline, the geographic location of student loan bonds shall be considered to be the same as the geographic locations of the educational institutions which are reasonably expected to make use of the proceeds of such student loan bonds; the geographic location of single-family housing bonds shall be considered to be the same as the geographic location of the issuer or, in the case of the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority, the geographic location, specified by the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority to the department in writing; and the geographic location of the private activity portion of governmental use bonds shall be considered to be the same as the geographic location of the issuer.

(2) Special consideration shall be given to projects that would promote or expand economic opportunities, with particular attention given to areas of economic distress.

(3) Special consideration shall be given to those projects that will meet a severe and critical need and which can demonstrate a significant impact on the territorial area of the issuer in which the project will be carried out.

(4) Special consideration shall be given to projects which the department has determined will enhance the public good and general welfare of the state as a whole.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-202, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-82-195, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 2-3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990 repealed the former Code Section 36-82-195, which was based on Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1, and which established the limited purpose share in 1988 and 1989.

36-82-196. Factors to consider in applying policy guidelines.

Statute text

When the department is required to apply the policy guidelines it may consider such factors, known as evaluation factors, in deciding which applications should receive a notice of allocation. The evaluation factors to be considered shall include, but are not limited to, the number of permanent jobs created or retained; the commitment of the borrower to hire individuals eligible for training under the Job Training Partnership Act or its successor program; the unemployment rate of the territorial area of the issuer compared to the state as a whole; the ratio of private investment to bond financing; evidence of HoDAG or UDAG approval; the amount of benefit to low-income to moderate-income individuals; the cost per qualified residential rental unit; the housing vacancy rate of the territory of the issuer compared to the state as a whole, as determined by the department; and the degree to which the combination of income and price limits serve to target the single-family housing bonds to low-income to moderate-income households.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-203, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-82-196, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 36.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990 repealed the former Code Section 36-82-196, which was based on Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1, and which related to applications for the limited purpose share and applications for notices of allocation from the limited purpose share.

36-82-197. Transfer of fund from economic development share or applicable reservation component of housing share to the flexible share.

Statute text

If after the first six months of the year, 75 percent or more of the economic development share or any one or more reservation components of the housing share remains unallocated, the commissioner may transfer any available state ceiling, or any part thereof, from the economic development share or the applicable reservation component of the housing share, as the case may be, to the flexible share, if the commissioner anticipates that such amounts are not likely to be used in either the economic development share or the applicable reservation component of the housing share; provided, however, that no such transfer may be made by the commissioner if an issuer submits a letter to the commissioner indicating that such issuer intends to use all or a portion exceeding 25 percent of the respective share or components thereof.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-204, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-82-197, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990 repealed the former Code Section 36-82-197, which was based on Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1 and which established the department share for 1988, 1989, 1990, and years thereafter.

36-82-198. Flexible share carryforward funds.

Statute text

The department may set aside and reserve from the flexible share amounts which may be treated as a carryforward for one or more carryforward purposes, within the meaning of Section 146 of the Federal Code. Section 146 of the Federal Code requires an election for the use of such carryforward to a future year or years, and regulations with respect to such carryforwards may be promulgated under the Federal Code. The department shall promulgate such rules and procedures as may be necessary in order to use the provisions of the Federal Code and any regulations promulgated pursuant to the Federal Code for such carryforward. The amount of any such carryforward which is set aside and reserved shall be subtracted from the outstanding amount of the flexible share with the same effect as if a notice of allocation were in the amount of the carryforward and confirmation of issuance were received prior to the expiration date.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-205, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-82-198, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990 repealed former Code Section 36-82-198, which was based on Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1, and which established the flexible pool, the farm loan pool, and the competitive pool.

36-82-199. Carryforward applications.

Statute text

(a) Unless otherwise determined by the commissioner, carryforward election applications must be filed with the department no later than December 1 of each year. Carryforward election applications shall be filed, received, and acted upon by the department as set forth in this Code section.

(b) Carryforward election applications shall be filed on a form promulgated from time to time by the commissioner. Each carryforward election application shall be accompanied by the following:

(1) A copy of the inducement resolution or other similar official action to the effect the issuer has taken preliminary official action approving the undertaking of the carryforward project;

(2) A written opinion of legal counsel, addressed to the department, to the effect that the issuer is authorized under the laws of the state to issue bonds for projects of the same type and nature as the project which is the subject of the carryforward election application. This opinion shall cite by constitutional or statutory reference, including a reference to the session laws of the General Assembly in the case of a constitutional reference, the provisions of the Constitution or law of the state which authorizes bonds for the project;

(3) A written opinion of legal counsel, addressed to the department, to the effect that the bonds which are covered by the carryforward election application will, based upon the information available at the time to such legal counsel, qualify for carryforward under Section 146(f) of the Federal Code; and

(4) Any other information as reasonably required by the department.

(c) The department shall, in its discretion, decide which carryforward election applications shall receive a notice of allocation. The decision of the department shall be final and conclusive.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-206, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990, redesignated former Code Section 36-82-206 as present Code Section 36-82-199. Former Code Section 36-82-199 is present Code Section 36-82-194.

36-82-200. Mortgage credit certificate carryforward election.

Statute text

No issuer of single-family housing bonds may elect to exchange any part of a notice of allocation for mortgage credit certificates without the written authorization of the department. Such authorization shall be in the discretion of the commissioner, and no issuer shall have any right to such authorization. Any unused amount of the state ceiling remaining on the last business day of each year and not subject to a notice of allocation shall automatically be exchanged for mortgage credit certificates carryforward elections in such amounts and to such issuers as the department may determine. Applications for mortgage credit certificates for carryforward purposes shall be on the same forms and accompanied by the same items as required by Code Section 36-82-199.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-207, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-82-200, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990, repealed former Code Section 36-82-200, which was based on Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1, and which related to applications for notices of allocation from the farm loan pool.

36-82-201. State ceiling deemed allocated and assigned.

Statute text

If necessary or appropriate for complying with federal rules and regulations implementing the Federal Code, the state ceiling shall be deemed to be allocated to the state and the state's allocation shall be deemed to be or have been assigned to the issuers to which notices of allocations are or were issued.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-208, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-82-201, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990, deleted former Code Section 36-82-201, which was based on Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1, and which related to applications for notices of allocation from the competitive pool.

36-82-202. Applicability.

Statute text

The provisions of this article shall apply to all bonds issued on or after April 1, 1990.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-209, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - The former provisions of Code Section 36-82-202 are the present provisions of Code Section 36-82-195.

——————————

ARTICLE 9

TRUSTS

36-82-220. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Governmental unit" means any county, municipal corporation, school district, or political subdivision of the state.

(2) "Local authority" means any public corporation or authority created by or pursuant to a local or special Act of the General Assembly or a local or special amendment to the Constitution.

(3) "Obligations" means any bonds, notes, certificates, or obligations of any kind to evidence any repayment obligation for money borrowed or to evidence any divided or undivided interest in any lease or installment purchase contract or other obligation.

(4) "Sponsoring governmental unit" means:

(A) Any governmental unit the governing body of which, or any member thereof which, is authorized by law or constitutional amendment to appoint or elect any member of the governing body of a local authority;

(B) Any governmental unit within the territorial or corporate limits of which any member of the governing body of a local authority is required by law or constitutional amendment to reside;

(C) Any governmental unit an elected or appointed official of which is required by law or constitutional amendment to be a member of the governing body of a local authority; or

(D) Any governmental unit any part of the territorial or corporate limits of which are located within the territorial or corporate limits of a governmental unit described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-220, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 584, § 1.)

36-82-221. Sponsoring governmental unit requirement.

Statute text

No local authority shall issue or be a grantor of a trust which issues any obligations to finance or refinance any real or personal property to be owned, leased, or operated by any governmental unit which is not a sponsoring governmental unit of such local authority.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-221, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 584, § 1.)

36-82-222. Construction.

Statute text

This article shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof. Insofar as the provisions of this article may be inconsistent with the provisions of any local or special amendment to the Constitution, this article shall control and shall be deemed to be an exercise of the power to enlarge or restrict the provisions of such local or special constitutional amendment.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-222, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 584, § 1.)

——————————

ARTICLE 10

COMMERCIAL PAPER NOTES FROM GOVERNMENT

36-82-240. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Governing body" means the board, commission, council, or other local legislative body of governmental entity.

(2) "Governmental entity" means any school district, independent school system, county, municipal corporation, consolidated city-county government, or other political subdivision of the state, any local authority, local body corporate, or local public corporation created by or pursuant to the Constitution of Georgia or any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly, or any special district or community improvement district of the state. The term "governmental entity" does not include "state authorities" as defined in paragraph (9) of Code Section 50-17-21.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-240, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 886, § 5.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Governmental commercial paper notes, § 50-17-90 et seq.

36-82-241. Governed by general provisions on commercial paper; issuance of security by governmental entity; requirements of governing body renewal and reissuance of commercial paper.

Statute text

(a) Whenever a governmental entity is authorized by law to issue bonds, notes, or certificates, including but not limited to general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, bond anticipation notes, tax anticipation notes, or revenue anticipation certificates, such governmental entity is authorized to issue such obligation in the form of commercial paper notes. The issuance of commercial paper notes shall be subject to the same restrictions and provisions under the laws of this state which would be applicable to the issuance of the type of bond, note, or certificate in lieu of which the commercial paper notes are being issued. The governing body of any governmental entity may designate the commercial paper notes issued under this article to be in registered form or bearer form and may provide for payment by wire transfers or electronic funds transfer in accordance with the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1693, et seq. The authority granted by this article to issue commercial paper notes shall not be construed to permit the governmental entity to increase or otherwise alter any debt limits.

(b) To secure commercial paper notes authorized under this article, a governmental entity may:

(1) Pledge its anticipated taxes, grants, other revenue; the proceeds of any bonds, notes, or other permanent financing; or any combination thereof;

(2) Segregate any pledged funds in separate accounts that may be held by the governmental entity or third parties;

(3) Enter into contracts with third parties to obtain standby lines of credit or other financial commitments designated to provide additional security for commercial paper notes authorized by this article;

(4) Establish any reserves deemed necessary for the payment of the commercial paper notes; and

(5) Adopt ordinances or resolutions and enter into agreements containing covenants, including covenants to issue bonds, notes, or other permanent financing and provisions for protection and security of the owners of commercial paper notes, which shall constitute enforceable contracts with such owners.

(c) Commercial paper notes authorized by this article may be in any form and contain any terms, including provisions for redemption at the option of the owner and provisions for the varying of interest rates in accordance with any index, banker's loan rate, or other standard.

(d) The governing body shall adopt an ordinance or resolution finding that issuance of the obligations in the form of commercial paper notes is necessary and desirable, directing the designated officer to arrange for preparation of the requisite number of suitable notes, and specifying other provisions relating to the commercial paper notes including the following:

(1) For each program of commercial paper notes authorized, the final date of maturity and the total aggregate principal amount of the commercial paper notes authorized to be outstanding at any one time up to the maturity date. The ordinance or resolution may provide that the commercial paper notes may be issued and renewed from time to time until the final maturity date and that the amount issued from time to time may be set by a designated officer of the governmental entity up to the maximum amount authorized to be outstanding at any one time. The ordinance or resolution shall include methods of setting the dates, numbers, and denominations of the commercial paper notes;

(2) The method of setting the interest rates and interest payment dates applicable to the commercial paper notes. Commercial paper notes may bear a stated rate of interest payable only at maturity, which rate or rates may be determined at the time of sale of each unit of commercial paper notes;

(3) The maximum effective rate of interest the commercial paper notes shall bear;

(4) The manner of sale;

(5) The discount, if any, the governmental entity may allow;

(6) Any provisions for the redemption of the commercial paper notes prior to the stated maturity;

(7) The technical form and language of the commercial paper notes; and

(8) All other terms and conditions of the commercial paper notes and of their execution, issuance, and sale deemed necessary and appropriate by the governing body.

(e) The governing body, in the ordinance or resolution authorizing the issuance of commercial paper notes under this article, may delegate to any elected or appointed official or employee of the governmental entity the authority to determine maturity dates, principal amounts, redemption provisions, interest rates, and other terms and conditions of such commercial paper notes that are not appropriately determined at the time of enactment or adoption of the authorizing ordinance or resolution, which delegated authority shall be exercised subject to such parameters, limitations, and criteria as may be set forth in such ordinance or resolution.

(f) Any commercial paper notes may be sold at negotiated sale at a price below the par value thereof.

(g) For purposes of determining the principal amount of debt outstanding in connection with complying with any limitations on the amount of debt outstanding for a governmental entity, commercial paper notes shall be deemed outstanding at any time during the term of a program of commercial paper notes in an amount equal to the maximum amount authorized in the ordinance or resolution.

(h) The renewal and reissuance from time to time of the commercial paper notes pursuant to a commercial paper note program in an amount up to the maximum amount authorized by the ordinance or resolution shall be deemed to be a refunding of the previously maturing amount.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-241, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 886, § 5.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, "U.S.C." was substituted for "U.S.C.," in subsection (a); and in paragraph (b)(1), "revenue;" was substituted for "revenue,", and "financing;" was substituted for "financing,".

——————————

ARTICLE 11

INTEREST RATE MANAGEMENT AGREEMENTS

Annotations

Cross references. - Interest and usury, T. 7, C. 4.

Interest rate management, § 50-17-100 et seq.

36-82-250. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Counterparty" means the party entering into a qualified interest rate management agreement with the local governmental entity. A counterparty must be a bank, insurance company, or other financial institution duly qualified to do business in the state that either:

(A) Has, or whose obligations are guaranteed by an entity that has, at the time of entering into a qualified interest rate management agreement and for the entire term thereof, a long-term unsecured debt rating or financial strength rating in one of the top two ratings categories, without regard to any refinement or gradation of rating category by numerical modifier or otherwise, assigned by any two of the following: Moody's Investors Service, Inc., Standard & Poors Ratings Service, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc., Fitch, Inc., or such other nationally recognized ratings service approved by the governing body of the local governmental entity; or

(B) Has collateralized its obligations under a qualified interest rate management agreement in a manner approved by the local governmental entity.

(2) "Debt" shall include all debt and revenue obligations that a local governmental entity is authorized to incur by law, including without limitation general obligation debt in the form of bonds or other obligations, revenue bonds and other forms of revenue obligations, and all other debt or revenue undertakings, including, but not limited to, bonds, notes, warrants, certificates or other evidences of indebtedness, or other obligations for borrowed money issued or to be issued by any local governmental entity. "Debt" includes any financing lease or installment purchase contracts of any local public authorities.

(3) "Independent financial adviser" means a person or entity experienced in the financial aspects and risks of qualified interest rate management agreements that is retained by the local governmental entity to render advice with respect to a qualified interest rate management agreement. The independent financial adviser may not be the counterparty or an affiliate or agent of the counterparty on a qualified interest rate management agreement with respect to which the independent financial adviser is advising the local governmental entity.

(4) "Interest rate management plan" means a written plan prepared or reviewed by an independent financial adviser with respect to qualified interest rate management agreements of the local governmental entity, which plan has been approved by the governing body of the local governmental entity.

(5) "Lease or installment purchase contract" means multiyear lease, purchase, installment purchase, or lease purchase contracts within the meaning of Code Sections 20-2-506 and 36-60-13 or substantially similar other or successor Code sections.

(6) "Local governmental entity" means any governmental body as defined in paragraph (2) of Code Section 36-82-61, as amended; provided, however, that such term shall only include authorities which are local public authorities included in the definition thereof set forth in subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (2) of Code Section 36-82-61, as amended.

(7) "Qualified interest rate management agreement" means an agreement, including a confirmation evidencing a transaction effected under a master agreement entered into by the local governmental entity in accordance with, and fulfilling the requirements of, Code Section 36-82-253, which agreement in the judgment of the local governmental entity is designed to manage interest rate risk or interest cost of the local governmental entity on any debt or lease or installment purchase contract the local governmental entity is authorized to incur, including, but not limited to, interest rate swaps or exchange agreements, interest rate caps, collars, corridors, ceiling, floor, and lock agreements, forward agreements, swaptions, warrants, and other interest rate agreements which, in the judgment of the local governmental entity, will assist the local governmental entity in managing its interest rate risk or interest cost.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-250, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 642, § 1/SB 227.)

36-82-251. Qualified interest rate management agreements authorized.

Statute text

With respect to all or any portion of any debt or lease or installment purchase contract, either issued or anticipated to be issued by the local governmental entity, the local governmental entity may enter into, terminate, amend, or otherwise modify a qualified interest rate management agreement under such terms and conditions as the local governmental entity may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the local governmental entity to pay to or receive from any counterparty any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-251, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 642, § 1/SB 227.)

36-82-252. Plan required; annual review of plan and report.

Statute text

(a) Prior to executing and delivering a qualified interest rate management agreement, the local governmental entity shall have adopted an interest rate management plan that includes:

(1) An analysis of the interest rate risk, basis risk, termination risk, credit risk, market-access risk, and other risks to the local governmental entity entering into qualified interest rate management agreements;

(2) The local governmental entity's procedure for approving and executing qualified interest rate management agreements;

(3) The local governmental entity's plan to monitor interest rate risk, basis risk, termination risk, credit risk, market-access risk, and other risks;

(4) The local governmental entity's procedure for maintaining current records of all qualified interest rate management agreements that have been approved and executed; and

(5) Such other provisions as may from time to time be required by the governing body of the local governmental entity, including but not limited to additional provisions due to changes in market conditions for qualified interest rate management agreements.

(b) The local governmental entity shall conduct an annual review of its interest rate management plan as to the adequacy of the procedures set forth in such plan for the analysis and monitoring requirements set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section. A report summarizing the results of such review shall be submitted annually to the governing body of the local governmental entity. The requirements of this subsection shall not be construed as to require the review of any existing interest rate management plan by an independent financial adviser.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-252, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 642, § 1/SB 227.)

36-82-253. Requirements for plans; renewal or termination; provisions and limitations regarding obligation for payment; credit enhancement and liquidity agreements.

Statute text

(a) Each qualified interest rate management agreement shall meet the following requirements:

(1) Subject to subsection (b) of this Code section, the maximum term, including any renewal periods, of any qualified interest rate management agreement may not exceed ten years unless such longer term has been approved by the governing body of the local governmental entity; provided, however, that in no case may the term of the qualified interest rate management agreement exceed the latest maturity date of the bonds, notes, or debt or lease or installment purchase contract referenced in the qualified interest rate management agreement;

(2) The local governmental entity shall enter into a qualified interest rate management agreement only with a counterparty meeting the requirements set forth in paragraph (1) of Code Section 36-82-250;

(3) Prior to the execution and delivery by the local governmental entity of any qualified interest rate management agreement, an interest rate management plan meeting the requirements of Code Section 36-82-252 must have been approved by the governing body of the local governmental entity and the governing body of the local governmental entity shall have been provided evidence that such qualified interest rate management agreement is in compliance with the existing interest rate management plan;

(4) Any qualified interest rate management agreement shall be payable only in the currency of the United States of America; and

(5) Unless otherwise approved by the governing body of the local governmental entity, the notional amount of any qualified interest rate management agreement shall not exceed the outstanding principal amount of the debt or the aggregate payments due under any lease or installment purchase contract to which such agreement relates.

(b) A qualified interest rate management agreement may renew from calendar year to calendar year and may provide for the payment of any fee related to a termination or a nonrenewal, so long as the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) Such qualified interest rate management agreement shall terminate absolutely at the close of the calendar year in which it was executed and at the close of each succeeding calendar year for which it may be renewed;

(2) Any such qualified interest rate management agreement may provide for automatic renewal unless positive action is taken by the local governmental entity to terminate such contract, or may provide for termination or renewal in some other manner not prohibited by law, which method of renewal or termination, in either case, shall be specified in the qualified interest rate management agreement; and

(3) Such qualified interest rate management agreement shall include a statement of the total obligation of the local governmental entity for the calendar year of execution and, if renewed, for the calendar year of renewal.

A qualified interest rate management agreement meeting the requirements of this subsection may also provide that the local governmental entity's obligations will terminate immediately and absolutely at such time as appropriated and other funds encumbered for payment by the local governmental entity pursuant to the terms of such qualified interest rate management agreement are no longer available to satisfy such obligations. The total obligation of the local governmental entity for the calendar year payable pursuant to a qualified interest rate management agreement may be stated in contingent but objective terms with respect to variable rate payments or termination payments, but in that event a qualified interest rate management agreement must provide that it will terminate immediately and absolutely at such time as appropriated and other funds encumbered for its payment are no longer available to satisfy the obligations of the local governmental entity under such agreement. A qualified interest rate management agreement executed under this subsection shall not be deemed to create a debt of the local governmental entity or otherwise obligate the payment of any sum beyond the calendar year of execution or, in the event of a renewal, beyond the calendar year of such renewal.

(c) (1) Any qualified interest rate management agreement of a local governmental entity may provide that it is an unconditional, limited recourse obligation of such local governmental entity payable from a specified revenue source.

(2) A local governmental entity may, in any qualified interest rate management agreement that constitutes a limited recourse obligation of the local governmental entity, pledge to the punctual payment of amounts due under the qualified interest rate management agreement revenues from a specified revenue source, which shall not include any taxes, including, without limitation, collateral derived from such revenue source or proceeds of the debt, including debt for future delivery, to which such qualified interest rate management agreement relates.

(d) A qualified interest rate management agreement that constitutes a limited recourse obligation shall not be payable from or charged upon any funds other than the revenue identified as the source of payment thereof, nor shall the local governmental entity entering into the same be subject to any pecuniary liability thereon. No counterparty under any such qualified interest rate management agreement shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state or the local governmental entity to pay any amount due under any such qualified interest rate management agreement, nor to enforce payment thereof against any property of the state or local governmental entity, other than the specified revenue source; nor shall any such qualified interest rate management agreement constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the state or local governmental entity, other than the specified revenue source. Every such qualified interest rate management agreement shall contain a recital setting forth the substance of this subsection.

(e) Any local governmental entity may enter into credit enhancement or liquidity agreements in connection with any qualified interest rate management agreement containing such terms and conditions as the governing body determines are necessary or desirable, provided that any such agreement has the same source of payment as the related qualified interest rate management agreement.
